North Carolina, session 2025, SB967.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-153.7(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) Rate Reduction Trigger. – Notwithstanding the tax rates set out in subsection (a) of
this section, if the General Assembly has ratified a Current Operations Appropriations Act, as
defined in G.S. 143C-1-1, by July 1 of the fiscal year set out below and if total General Fund
revenue in a that fiscal year set out below exceeds the trigger amount indicated for that fiscal
year, then the applicable tax rate for the indicated and subsequent tax years shall be equal to the
greater of (i) the prior taxable year's rate decreased by one-half percentage point (0.50%) or (ii)
two and forty-nine hundredths percent (2.49%). For purposes of this subsection, total General
Fund revenue is the amount stated in the final accounting of total General Fund Reverting Net
Tax and Non-Tax Revenues for the fiscal year, as reported by the Office of State Controller in
August following the end of the fiscal year.
Fiscal Year Trigger Amount Taxable Year Beginning
FY 2025-2026 $33,042,000,000 In 2027
FY 2026-2027 $34,100,000,000 In 2028
FY 2027-2028 $34,760,000,000 In 2029
FY 2028-2029 $35,750,000,000 In 2030
FY 2029-2030 $36,510,000,000 In 2031
FY 2030-2031 $38,000,000,000 In 2032
FY 2031-2032 $38,500,000,000 In 2033
FY 2032-2033 $39,000,000,000 In 2034"
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S967-v-1*